Florida, session 2026, SB2518.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 86 87 Section 1.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (6) of 88 section 216.136, Florida Statutes, to read: 89 216.136âConsensus estimating conferences; duties and 90 principals.â 91 (6)âSOCIAL SERVICES ESTIMATING CONFERENCE.â 92 (c)âThe Social Services Estimating Conference shall develop 93 official information relating to the pilot program for 94 individuals with developmental disabilities implemented pursuant 95 to s. 409.9855, including, but not limited to, data related to 96 enrollment, caseloads, utilization of services, program 97 expenditures, and any other information that the conference 98 determines necessary for the state planning and budgeting system 99 and to project future budgets and drawdown of federal matching 100 funds. 101 Section 2.âSubsection (8) is added to section 394.495, 102 Florida Statutes, to read: 103 394.495âChild and adolescent mental health system of care; 104 programs and services.â 105 (8)âAs authorized by and consistent with funding 106 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act, the department 107 may contract with Valerieâs House, Inc., a nonprofit 108 organization exempt from taxation pursuant to s. 501(c)(3) of 109 the Internal Revenue Code, to provide grief support services to 110 help children and youth ages 4 to 19 who have experienced the 111 death of a parent or sibling. The services provided must be at 112 no cost to the bereaved child or his or her caregiver and may 113 include, but need not be limited to, grief support groups, 114 mentoring, individual grief counseling, financial crisis 115 support, and in-school support services. Valerieâs House, Inc., 116 may also provide grief awareness training and outreach to local 117 schools and medical facilities under the contract. 118 Section 3.âSubsection (3) of section 409.145, Florida 119 Statutes, is amended to read: 120 409.145âCare of children; âreasonable and prudent parentâ 121 standard.âThe child welfare system of the department shall 122 operate as a coordinated community-based system of care which 123 empowers all caregivers for children in foster care to provide 124 quality parenting, including approving or disapproving a childâs 125 participation in activities based on the caregiverâs assessment 126 using the âreasonable and prudent parentâ standard. 127 (3)âROOM AND BOARD RATES.â 128 (a)âEffective July 1, 2026 2022, room and board rates shall 129 be paid to foster parents, including relative and nonrelative 130 caregivers who are licensed as a level I child-specific foster 131 placement, and to relative and nonrelative caregivers who are 132 participating in the Relative Caregiver Program and receiving 133 payments pursuant to s. 39.5085(2)(d)1. or 2., as follows: 134 135 Monthly Room and Board Rate 136 0-5 YearsAge 6-12 YearsAge 13-21 YearsAge 137 $663.03 $517.94 $680.01 $531.21 $795.94 $621.77 138 (b)âEach January, foster parents, including relative and 139 nonrelative caregivers who are licensed as a level I child 140 specific foster placement and relative and nonrelative 141 caregivers who are participating in the Relative Caregiver 142 Program and receiving payments pursuant to s. 39.5085(2)(d)1. or 143 2., shall receive an annual cost of living increase. The 144 department shall calculate the new room and board rate increase 145 equal to the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for 146 All Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average, All Items, not 147 seasonally adjusted, or successor reports, for the preceding 148 December compared to the prior December as initially reported by 149 the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor 150 Statistics. The department shall make available the adjusted 151 room and board rates annually. 152 (c)âThe amount of the monthly room and board rate may be 153 increased upon agreement among the department, the community 154 based care lead agency, and the foster parent. 155 (d)âEffective July 1, 2022, community-based care lead 156 agencies providing care under contract with the department shall 157 pay a supplemental room and board payment to foster parents, 158 including relative and nonrelative caregivers who are licensed 159 as a level I child-specific foster placement and relative and 160 nonrelative caregivers who are participating in the Relative 161 Caregiver Program and receiving payments pursuant to s. 162 39.5085(2)(d)1. or 2., on a per-child basis, for providing 163 independent life skills and normalcy supports to children who 164 are 13 through 17 years of age placed in their care. The 165 supplemental payment must be paid monthly in addition to the 166 current monthly room and board rate payment. The supplemental 167 monthly payment shall be based on 10 percent of the monthly room 168 and board rate for children 13 through 21 years of age as 169 provided under this section and adjusted annually. 170 Section 4.âSection 409.1455, Florida Statutes, is amended 171 to read: 172 409.1455âStep into Success Workforce Education and 173 Internship Pilot Program for foster youth and former foster 174 youth.â 175 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âStep 176 into Success Act.â 177 (2)âCREATION.âThe department shall establish the 3-year 178 Step into Success Workforce Education and Internship Pilot 179 Program to give eligible foster youth and former foster youth an 180 opportunity to learn and develop essential workforce and 181 professional skills, to transition from the custody of the 182 department to independent living, and to become better prepared 183 for an independent and successful future. The pilot program must 184 consist of an independent living professionalism and workforce 185 education component and, for youth who complete that component, 186 an onsite workforce training internship component. In 187 consultation with subject-matter experts and the community-based 188 care lead agencies, the office shall develop and administer the 189 pilot program for interested foster youth and former foster 190 youth; however, the department may contract with entities that 191 have demonstrable subject-matter expertise in the transition to 192 adulthood for foster youth, workforce training and preparedness, 193 professional skills, and related subjects to collaborate with 194 the office in the development and administration of the pilot 195 program. The independent living professionalism and workforce 196 education component of the program must culminate in a 197 certificate that allows a former foster youth to participate in 198 the onsite workforce training internship. 199 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âFor purposes of this section, the term: 200 (a)ââCommunity-based care lead agencyâ has the same meaning 201 as in s. 409.986(3). 202 (b)ââFormer foster youthâ means an individual 18 years of 203 age or older but younger than 26 years of age who is currently 204 or was previously placed in licensed care, excluding Level I 205 licensed placements pursuant to s. 409.175(5)(a)1., for at least 206 60 days within this state. 207 (c)ââFoster youthâ means an individual older than 16 years 208 of age but younger than 18 years of age who is currently in 209 licensed care, excluding Level I licensed placements pursuant to 210 s. 409.175(5)(a)1. 211 (d)ââOfficeâ means the departmentâs Office of Continuing 212 Care. 213 (e)ââParticipating organizationâ means a state agency, a 214 corporation under chapter 607 or chapter 617, or another 215 relevant entity that has agreed to collaborate with the office 216 in the development and implementation of a trauma-informed 217 onsite workforce training internship program pursuant to 218 subsections (6) and (7). 219 (4)âREQUIREMENTS OF THE DEPARTMENT AND OFFICE.âThe 220 department shall establish and the office shall develop and 221 administer the pilot program for eligible foster youth and 222 former foster youth. The office shall do all of the following: 223 (a)âDevelop eligible foster youth and former foster youth 224 cohorts within the departmentâs regions. 225 (b)âCollaborate with local chambers of commerce and recruit 226 mentors and organizations within the departmentâs regions, 227 emphasizing recruitment of mentors and organizations in the 228 following counties: 229 1.âDuval. 230 2.âEscambia. 231 3.âHillsborough. 232 4.âPalm Beach. 233 5.âPolk. 234 (c)âProvide eligible former foster youth with a variety of 235 internship placement opportunities, including by connecting 236 existing third-party mentorship organizations that focus on 237 former foster youth with eligible former foster youth who have 238 an interest in such organizationsâ programs The pilot program 239 must be administered as part of an eligible foster youthâs 240 regular transition planning under s. 39.6035 or as a post 241 transition service for eligible former foster youth. The office 242 must begin the professionalism and workforce education component 243 of the program on or before January 1, 2024, and the onsite 244 workforce training internship component of the program on or 245 before July 1, 2024. 246 (5)âINDEPENDENT LIVING PROFESSIONALISM AND WORKFORCE 247 EDUCATION COMPONENT REQUIREMENTS.âThe office shall do all of the 248 following in connection with the independent living 249 professionalism and workforce education component for eligible 250 foster youth and former foster youth: 251 (a)âDesignate and ensure that the number of qualified staff 252 is sufficient to implement and administer the component, which 253 may be part of a larger independent living or life skills 254 training program if the larger program meets the requirements of 255 this subsection. 256 (b)âDevelop all workshops, presentations, and curricula for 257 the component, including, but not limited to, all written 258 educational and training materials for foster youth and former 259 foster youth. Resources may include, but are not limited to, 260 workshops and materials to assist with preparing rÃ©sumÃ©s, mock 261 interviews, experiential training, and assistance with securing 262 an internship or employment. The office must review and update 263 these materials as necessary. The training materials must 264 address, but are not limited to, the following: 265 1.âInterview skills; 266 2.âProfessionalism; 267 3.âTeamwork; 268 4.âLeadership; 269 5.âProblem solving; and 270 6.âConflict resolution in the workplace. 271 (c)âRequire that the training provided be in addition to 272 any other life skills or employment training required by law. 273 The training may be developed or administered by the department, 274 community-based care lead agencies, or the lead agenciesâ 275 subcontracted providers, or in collaboration with colleges or 276 universities or other nonprofit organizations in the community 277 with workforce education and training resources. 278 (d)âProvide relevant written materials from the component 279 and any relevant tools developed to ensure participantsâ 280 successful transition to internships to all participating 281 organizations that offer workforce training internship 282 opportunities. 283 (e)âProvide materials to inform eligible foster youth and 284 former foster youth of the program, the requirements for 285 participation, and contact information for enrollment. The 286 community-based care lead agencies shall ensure that any 287 subcontracted providers that directly serve youth receive this 288 information. 289 (f)âAdvertise and promote the availability of the education 290 and internship program to engage as many eligible foster youth 291 and former foster youth as possible. 292 (g)âAssess the career interests of each eligible foster 293 youth and former foster youth who expresses interest in 294 participating in the program and determine the most appropriate 295 internship and post-internship opportunities for that youth 296 based on his or her expressed interests. 297 (6)âONSITE WORKFORCE TRAINING INTERNSHIP COMPONENT 298 REQUIREMENTS.âThe office shall do all of the following in 299 connection with the onsite workforce training internship program 300 for eligible former foster youth: 301 (a)âDevelop processes and procedures to implement a trauma 302 informed onsite workforce training internship component. The 303 processes and procedures of the internship component must be 304 designed so that they can be replicated and scaled to meet 305 various organizational structures and sizes. The component must 306 include: 307 1.âRecruitment of agencies, corporations, and other 308 entities to host interns as participating organizations; 309 2.âAssisting participating organizations with mentor 310 recruitment, training, and matching; 311 3.âMentor-led performance reviews, including a review of 312 the internâs work product, professionalism, time management, 313 communication style, and stress-management strategies; 314 4.âDaily mentorship and coaching on topics such as: 315 a.âProfessionalism; 316 b.âTeamwork; 317 c.âLeadership; 318 d.âProblem solving; and 319 e.âConflict resolution in the workplace; 320 5.âDevelopment of opportunities for interns to become 321 employees of the participating organization; and 322 6.âReporting requirements specified in subsection (11). 323 (b)âDevelop a minimum of 1 hour of required trauma-informed 324 training for mentors to satisfy the requirements of sub 325 subparagraph (7)(b)1.e. Such training must include interactive 326 or experiential components, such as role-playing, scenario 327 discussion, or case studies. The office may provide at least 328 four additional 1-hour trainings on mentorship of special 329 populations as optional training opportunities, which must be 330 asynchronous and accessible to mentors online at their 331 convenience, and must inform participating organizations of 332 these optional training opportunities teach the skills necessary 333 to engage with participating eligible former foster youth. 334 (c)âProvide assistance to eligible foster youth and former 335 foster youth interested in participating in the internship 336 component, including, but not limited to, identifying and 337 monitoring internship opportunities, being knowledgeable of the 338 training and skills needed to match eligible foster youth and 339 former foster youth with appropriate internships, and assisting 340 eligible foster youth and former foster youth with applying for 341 post-internship employment opportunities. 342 (d)âPublicize specific internship positions in an easily 343 accessible manner and inform eligible foster youth and former 344 foster youth of where to locate such information. 345 (e)âProvide a participating former foster youth with 346 financial assistance in the amount of $1,717 $1,517 monthly and 347 develop a process and schedule for the distribution of payments 348 to former foster youth participating in the component, subject 349 to the availability of funds. 350 (f)âDistribute funds appropriated for the compensation of 351 mentors who are participating in the component as provided in 352 paragraph (7)(b). 353 (g)âBy May 1, 2024, provide to the Board of Governors and 354 the State Board of Education all relevant internship information 355 necessary to support the award of postsecondary credit or career 356 education clock hours for internship positions held by former 357 foster youth participating in the onsite workforce training 358 internship component. 359 (h)âDevelop and conduct follow-up surveys with: 360 1.âFormer foster youth within 3 months after their 361 internship start date to ensure successful transition into the 362 work environment and to gather feedback on how to improve the 363 experience for future participants. 364 2.âMentors assigned to participating former foster youth. 365 Such data must be collected by October 1, 2024, and by October 1 366 annually thereafter, for inclusion in the independent living 367 services annual report. 368 3.âAny other persons the office deems relevant for purposes 369 of continued improvement of the internship component. 370 (i)âAssign experienced staff to serve as program liaisons 371 who are available for mentors to contact whenever the mentors 372 need to debrief or have questions concerning a former foster 373 youth. 374 (7)âREQUIREMENTS FOR PARTICIPATING ORGANIZATIONS.âEach 375 organization participating in the onsite workforce training 376 internship component shall: 377 (a)âCollaborate with the office to implement a trauma 378 informed approach to mentoring and training former foster youth. 379 (b)âRecruit employees to serve as mentors for former foster 380 youth interning with such organizations. 381 1.âTo serve as a mentor, an employee must: 382 a.âHave worked in his or her career field or area for the 383 participating organization for at least 1 year; 384 b.âHave experience relevant to the job and task 385 responsibilities of the intern; 386 c.âSign a monthly hour statement for the intern; 387 d.âAllocate at least 1 hour per month to conduct mentor-led 388 performance reviews, to include a review of the internâs work 389 product, professionalism, time management, communication style, 390 and stress-management strategies; and 391 e.âComplete a minimum of 1 hour of trauma-informed training 392 to gain and maintain skills critical for successfully engaging 393 former foster youth. Before being matched with a former foster 394 youth, the employee must complete a 1-hour training that covers 395 core topics, including, but not limited to: 396 (I)âUnderstanding trauma and its impacts. 397 (II)âRecognizing and responding to trauma-related 398 behaviors. 399 (III)âDe-escalation strategies and crisis response. 400 (IV)âBoundaries and mentor self-care. 401 (V)âCommunication skills. 402 403 The department may offer a 1-hour training to review topics 404 covered by the training required under this sub-subparagraph 405 every subsequent year that the employee chooses to serve as a 406 mentor. 407 2.âSubject to available funding, an employee who serves as 408 a mentor and receives the required trauma-informed training is 409 eligible for a maximum payment of $1,200 per intern per fiscal 410 year, to be issued as a $100 monthly payment for every month of 411 service as a mentor. 412 3.âAn employee may serve as a mentor for a maximum of three 413 interns at one time and may not receive more than $3,600 in 414 compensation per fiscal year for serving as a mentor. Any time 415 spent serving as a mentor to an intern under this section counts 416 toward the minimum service required for eligibility for payments 417 pursuant to subparagraph 2. and this subparagraph. 418 4.âAn employee who serves as a mentor may participate in 419 additional trainings on the mentorship of special populations as 420 made available by the office. 421 (c)âWhen necessary, have a discussion with an internâs 422 assigned mentor, the participating organizationâs internship 423 program liaison, and the office about the creation of a 424 corrective action plan to address issues related to the internâs 425 professionalism, work product, or performance and, if 426 applicable, after giving the intern a reasonable opportunity to 427 comply with the corrective action plan, document the internâs 428 failure to do so before discharging him or her. 429 (d)âProvide relevant feedback to the office at least 430 annually for the office to comply with paragraph (6)(h). 431 (e)âCollaborate with the department to provide any 432 requested information necessary to prepare the annual report 433 required under subsection (11). 434 (8)âTIME LIMITATIONS FOR PARTICIPATION.âA former foster 435 youth who obtains an internship with a participating 436 organization may participate in the internship component for no 437 more than 1 year, calculated as 12 monthly stipend periods. The 438 year begins on his or her start date with a participating 439 organization. A former foster youth may intern under the 440 internship program with more than one participating 441 organization, but may not intern with more than one 442 participating organization at the same time. A participating 443 organization may hire the intern as an employee, but the hiring 444 of a former foster youth may not be for an internship under this 445 section. 446 (9)âAWARD OF POSTSECONDARY CREDIT.âThe Board of Governors 447 and the State Board of Education shall adopt regulations and 448 rules, respectively, to award postsecondary credit or career 449 education clock hours for eligible former foster youth 450 participating in the internship component pursuant to subsection 451 (4). The regulations and rules must include procedures for the 452 award of postsecondary credit or career education clock hours, 453 including, but not limited to, equivalency and alignment of the 454 internship component with appropriate postsecondary courses and 455 course descriptions. 456 (10)âCONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION IN THE INTERNSHIP 457 COMPONENT.â 458 (a)âTo become a participant in the internship component of 459 the program, the applicant must be a foster youth or a former 460 foster youth as those terms are defined in subsection (3) at the 461 time such youth applies for an internship position with a 462 participating organization. A foster youth or former foster 463 youth who has completed the training component with the 464 department may apply for a position with a participating 465 organization but may not begin an internship until attaining the 466 age of 18 years. 467 (b)âIf offered an internship, a former foster youth must be 468 classified as an intern and must work 80 hours per month to be 469 eligible for the stipend payment. 470 (c)âA former foster youth must spend any stipend funds 471 specified for clothing on clothing that is in compliance with 472 the dress code requirements of the participating organization 473 with which the former foster youth is interning. Notwithstanding 474 any limitation on funds provided to purchase clothing, the 475 former foster youth must comply with any dress code requirements 476 of the participating organization with which he or she is 477 interning. 478 (d)âStipend money earned pursuant to the internship 479 component may not be considered earned income for purposes of 480 computing eligibility for federal or state benefits, including, 481 but not limited to, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 482 Program, a housing choice assistance voucher program, the 483 Temporary Cash Assistance Program, the Medicaid program, or the 484 school readiness program. Notwithstanding this paragraph, any 485 reduction in the amount of benefits or loss of benefits due to 486 receipt of the Step into Success stipend may be offset by an 487 additional stipend payment equal to the value of the maximum 488 benefit amount for a single person allowed under the 489 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program. 490 (e)âA former foster youth may, at the discretion of a 491 postsecondary educational institution within this state in which 492 such youth is enrolled, earn postsecondary credit or career 493 education clock hours for work performed as an intern under the 494 internship component. Postsecondary credit and career education 495 clock hours earned for work performed under the internship 496 component may be in addition to any compensation earned for the 497 same work performed under the internship component and may be 498 awarded for completion of all or any part of the internship 499 component. Participating organizations shall cooperate with 500 postsecondary educational institutions to provide any 501 information about internship positions which is necessary to 502 enable the institutions to determine whether to grant the 503 participating former foster youth postsecondary credit or career 504 education clock hours toward his or her degree. 505 (f)âA former foster youth who accepts an internship with a 506 participating organization pursuant to this section may only be 507 discharged from the internship component after the participating 508 organization engages the internâs assigned mentor and the 509 participating organizationâs internship program staff to assist 510 the intern in performing the duties of the internship. Before 511 discharging the former foster youth, the participating 512 organization must also document the internâs failure to comply 513 with a corrective action plan after being given a reasonable 514 opportunity to do so. 515 (11)âREPORT.âThe department shall include a section on the 516 Step into Success Workforce Education and Internship Pilot 517 Program in the independent living annual report prepared 518 pursuant to s. 409.1451(6) which includes, but is not limited 519 to, all of the following: 520 (a)âWhether the pilot program is in compliance with this 521 section, and if not, barriers to compliance. 522 (b)âA list of participating organizations and the number of 523 interns. 524 (c)âA summary of recruitment efforts to increase the number 525 of participating organizations. 526 (d)âA summary of the feedback and surveys received pursuant 527 to paragraph (6)(h) from participating former foster youth, 528 mentors, and others who have participated in the pilot program. 529 (e)âRecommendations, if any, for actions necessary to 530 improve the quality, effectiveness, and outcomes of the pilot 531 program. 532 (f)âEmployment outcomes of former foster youth who 533 participated in the pilot program, including employment status 534 after completion of the program, whether he or she is employed 535 by the participating organization in which he or she interned or 536 by another entity, and job description and salary information, 537 if available. 538 (12)âRULEMAKING.âThe department shall adopt rules to 539 implement this section. 540 Section 5.âSection 409.1475, Florida Statutes, is created 541 to read: 542 409.1475âFoster and Family Support Grant Program.â 543 (1)âThe Legislature recognizes that children and families 544 thrive when caregivers are engaged, supported, and equipped to 545 meet their responsibilities. It is the intent of the Legislature 546 to strengthen community-based support that promotes stable 547 caregiving relationships, responsible parenting, and improved 548 outcomes for vulnerable children. Therefore, the Foster and 549 Family Support Grant Program is created within the department. 550 (2)âThe department shall award grants to not-for-profit, 551 faith-based organizations to support their efforts in the 552 recruitment of foster and adoptive families through faith-based 553 organizations and strengthening local capacity to support 554 foster, adoptive, and kinship families and families caring for 555 vulnerable children in underserved and rural communities. The 556 program shall emphasize sustained, community-based support 557 beyond initial licensure or training in order to improve 558 caregiver retention and outcomes for children. 559 (3)âAwarded grant funds must be used to provide education, 560 resources, training, and technical assistance to eligible faith 561 based organizations involved in foster care, adoption, and 562 family preservation activities and to support the development of 563 trauma-informed, community-based support systems for families 564 throughout the caregiving continuum. Allowable uses of funds 565 include, but are not limited to: 566 (a)âOutreach and recruitment activities to increase the 567 number of licensed foster and adoptive families; 568 (b)âTraining and support for organizations and volunteers 569 assisting foster, adoptive, and kinship families and families; 570 (c)âTrauma-informed training, coaching, and counseling 571 services for caregivers, families, and individuals involved in 572 supporting children in out-of-home care or at risk of entry into 573 care; 574 (d)âProgram support and other activities to strengthen 575 local capacities to support foster, adoptive, and kinship 576 families and families. 577 (e)âExpansion of foster parent training initiatives 578 designed to improve caregiver engagement, retention, and 579 placement stability; 580 (f)âDevelopment of volunteer-based wraparound support 581 services for foster and adoptive families, including kinship 582 caregivers; 583 (g)âAssistance with essential family needs for families 584 actively fostering, adopting, or pursuing licensure, consistent 585 with federal and state law; and 586 (h)âOngoing family mentoring and peer support to promote 587 placement stability, permanency, and family well-being. 588 (4)âGrant recipients must submit reports to the department 589 in a format and at intervals, at least annually, as prescribed 590 by the department. 591 (5)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 592 section. 593 Section 6.âUpon the expiration and reversion of the 594 amendments made to s. 409.908, Florida Statutes, pursuant to 595 section 26 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, paragraph (b) 596 of subsection (2) of section 409.908, Florida Statutes, is 597 amended to read: 598 409.908âReimbursement of Medicaid providers.âSubject to 599 specific appropriations, the agency shall reimburse Medicaid 600 providers, in accordance with state and federal law, according 601 to methodologies set forth in the rules of the agency and in 602 policy manuals and handbooks incorporated by reference therein. 603 These methodologies may include fee schedules, reimbursement 604 methods based on cost reporting, negotiated fees, competitive 605 bidding pursuant to s. 287.057, and other mechanisms the agency 606 considers efficient and effective for purchasing services or 607 goods on behalf of recipients. If a provider is reimbursed based 608 on cost reporting and submits a cost report late and that cost 609 report would have been used to set a lower reimbursement rate 610 for a rate semester, then the providerâs rate for that semester 611 shall be retroactively calculated using the new cost report, and 612 full payment at the recalculated rate shall be effected 613 retroactively. Medicare-granted extensions for filing cost 614 reports, if applicable, shall also apply to Medicaid cost 615 reports. Payment for Medicaid compensable services made on 616 behalf of Medicaid-eligible persons is subject to the 617 availability of moneys and any limitations or directions 618 provided for in the General Appropriations Act or chapter 216. 619 Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent 620 or limit the agency from adjusting fees, reimbursement rates, 621 lengths of stay, number of visits, or number of services, or 622 making any other adjustments necessary to comply with the 623 availability of moneys and any limitations or directions 624 provided for in the General Appropriations Act, provided the 625 adjustment is consistent with legislative intent. 626 (2) 627 (b)âSubject to any limitations or directions in the General 628 Appropriations Act, the agency shall establish and implement a 629 state Title XIX Long-Term Care Reimbursement Plan for nursing 630 home care in order to provide care and services in conformance 631 with the applicable state and federal laws, rules, regulations, 632 and quality and safety standards and to ensure that individuals 633 eligible for medical assistance have reasonable geographic 634 access to such care. 635 1.âThe agency shall amend the long-term care reimbursement 636 plan and cost reporting system to create direct care and 637 indirect care subcomponents of the patient care component of the 638 per diem rate. These two subcomponents together shall equal the 639 patient care component of the per diem rate. Separate prices 640 shall be calculated for each patient care subcomponent, 641 initially based on the September 2016 rate setting cost reports 642 and subsequently based on the most recently audited cost report 643 used during a rebasing year. The direct care subcomponent of the 644 per diem rate for any providers still being reimbursed on a cost 645 basis shall be limited by the cost-based class ceiling, and the 646 indirect care subcomponent may be limited by the lower of the 647 cost-based class ceiling, the target rate class ceiling, or the 648 individual provider target. The ceilings and targets apply only 649 to providers being reimbursed on a cost-based system. Effective 650 October 1, 2018, a prospective payment methodology shall be 651 implemented for rate setting purposes with the following 652 parameters: 653 a.âPeer Groups, including: 654 (I)âNorth-SMMC Regions 1-9, less Palm Beach and Okeechobee 655 Counties; and 656 (II)âSouth-SMMC Regions 10-11, plus Palm Beach and 657 Okeechobee Counties. 658 b.âPercentage of Median Costs based on the cost reports 659 used for September 2016 rate setting: 660 (I)âDirect Care Costs........................100 percent. 661 (II)âIndirect Care Costs......................92 percent. 662 (III)âOperating Costs.........................86 percent. 663 c.âFloors: 664 (I)âDirect Care Component.....................95 percent. 665 (II)âIndirect Care Component................92.5 percent. 666 (III)âOperating Component...........................None. 667 d.âPass-through Payments..................Real Estate and 668 ...............................................Personal Property 669 ...................................Taxes and Property Insurance. 670 e.âQuality Incentive Program Payment 671 Pool...............................14.77 10 percent of September 672 .......................................2016 non-property related 673 ................................payments of included facilities. 674 f.âQuality Score Threshold to Qualify for Quality Incentive 675 Payment.......33 percent of all available points in the Medicaid 676 Quality Incentive Program 20th 677 ..............................percentile of included facilities. 678 g.âFair Rental Value System Payment Parameters: 679 (I)âBuilding Value per Square Foot based on 2018 RS Means. 680 (II)âLand Valuation...10 percent of Gross Building value. 681 (III)âFacility Square Footage......Actual Square Footage. 682 (IV)âMovable Equipment Allowance..........$8,000 per bed. 683 (V)âObsolescence Factor......................1.5 percent. 684 (VI)âFair Rental Rate of Return................8 percent. 685 (VII)âMinimum Occupancy.......................90 percent. 686 (VIII)âMaximum Facility Age.....................40 years. 687 (IX)âMinimum Square Footage per Bed..................350. 688 (X)âMaximum Square Footage for Bed...................500. 689 (XI)âMinimum Cost of a renovation/replacements$500 per bed. 690 h.âVentilator Supplemental payment of $200 per Medicaid day 691 of 40,000 ventilator Medicaid days per fiscal year. 692 2.âThe agency shall revise its methodology for calculating 693 Quality Incentive Program payments to: 694 a.âInclude the results of consumer satisfaction surveys 695 conducted pursuant to s. 400.0225 as a measure of nursing home 696 quality. The agency shall so revise the methodology after the 697 surveys have been in effect for an amount of time the agency 698 deems sufficient for statistical and scientific validity as a 699 meaningful quality measure that may be incorporated into the 700 methodology. 701 b.âDuring the next rebasing for the Quality Incentive 702 Program, consider implementing the recommendations proposed in 703 sections 3.1.2-3.1.5 of the Study of Nursing Home Quality 704 Incentive Programs Final Report that was prepared by Guidehouse, 705 Inc., and presented to the agency on December 22, 2025. 706 c.âDelay the effective date of any change made to its 707 methodology or scoring due to rebasing for 1 year after any 708 recalculations have been completed and the scores have been made 709 available to the public. 710 3.âThe direct care subcomponent shall include salaries and 711 benefits of direct care staff providing nursing services 712 including registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, and 713 certified nursing assistants who deliver care directly to 714 residents in the nursing home facility, allowable therapy costs, 715 and dietary costs. This excludes nursing administration, staff 716 development, the staffing coordinator, and the administrative 717 portion of the minimum data set and care plan coordinators. The 718 direct care subcomponent also includes medically necessary 719 dental care, vision care, hearing care, and podiatric care. 720 4.âAll other patient care costs shall be included in the 721 indirect care cost subcomponent of the patient care per diem 722 rate, including complex medical equipment, medical supplies, and 723 other allowable ancillary costs. Costs may not be allocated 724 directly or indirectly to the direct care subcomponent from a 725 home office or management company. 726 5.âOn July 1 of each year, the agency shall report to the 727 Legislature direct and indirect care costs, including average 728 direct and indirect care costs per resident per facility and 729 direct care and indirect care salaries and benefits per category 730 of staff member per facility. 731 6.âEvery fourth year, the agency shall rebase nursing home 732 prospective payment rates to reflect changes in cost based on 733 the most recently audited cost report for each participating 734 provider. 735 7.âA direct care supplemental payment may be made to 736 providers whose direct care hours per patient day are above the 737 80th percentile and who provide Medicaid services to a larger 738 percentage of Medicaid patients than the state average. 739 8.âPediatric, Florida Department of Veterans Affairs, and 740 government-owned facilities are exempt from the pricing model 741 established in this subsection and shall remain on a cost-based 742 prospective payment system. Effective October 1, 2018, the 743 agency shall set rates for all facilities remaining on a cost 744 based prospective payment system using each facilityâs most 745 recently audited cost report, eliminating retroactive 746 settlements. 747 9.âBy October 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, the agency 748 shall submit to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and 749 the Speaker of the House of Representatives a report on each 750 Quality Incentive Program payment made pursuant to sub 751 subparagraph 1.e. The report must, at a minimum, include all of 752 the following information: 753 a.âThe name of each facility that received a Quality 754 Incentive Program payment and the dollar amount of such payment 755 each facility received. 756 b.âThe total number of quality incentive metric points 757 awarded by the agency to each facility and the number of points 758 awarded by the agency for each individual quality metric 759 measured. 760 c.âAn examination of any trends in the improvement of the 761 quality of care provided to nursing home residents which may be 762 attributable to incentive payments received under the Quality 763 Incentive Program. The agency shall include examination of 764 trends both for the program as a whole as well as for each 765 individual quality metric used by the agency to award program 766 payments. 767 768 It is the intent of the Legislature that the reimbursement plan 769 achieve the goal of providing access to health care for nursing 770 home residents who require large amounts of care while 771 encouraging diversion services as an alternative to nursing home 772 care for residents who can be served within the community. The 773 agency shall base the establishment of any maximum rate of 774 payment, whether overall or component, on the available moneys 775 as provided for in the General Appropriations Act. The agency 776 may base the maximum rate of payment on the results of 777 scientifically valid analysis and conclusions derived from 778 objective statistical data pertinent to the particular maximum 779 rate of payment. The agency shall base the rates of payments in 780 accordance with the minimum wage requirements as provided in the 781 General Appropriations Act. 782 Section 7.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (6) of 783 section 409.9855, Florida Statutes, to read: 784 409.9855âPilot program for individuals with developmental 785 disabilities.â 786 (6)âPROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION AND EVALUATION.â 787 (d)âThe agency shall collect and analyze data needed to 788 project program enrollment costs, current and projected 789 caseloads, utilization, and current and projected expenditures 790 for the next 3 years. The agency shall report caseload and 791 expenditure data and trends and any other information requested 792 by the Social Services Estimating Conference in accordance with 793 chapter 216. 794 Section 8.âSubsection (5) of section 409.990, Florida 795 Statutes, is amended to read: 796 409.990âFunding for lead agencies.âA contract established 797 between the department and a lead agency must be funded by a 798 grant of general revenue, other applicable state funds, or 799 applicable federal funding sources. 800 (5)âA lead agency may carry forward documented unexpended 801 state funds from one fiscal year to the next; however, the 802 cumulative amount carried forward may not exceed 8 percent of 803 the annual amount of the total contract. Any unexpended state 804 funds in excess of that percentage must be returned to the 805 department. 806 (a)âThe funds carried forward may not be used in any way 807 that would create increased recurring future obligations, and 808 such funds may not be used for any type of program or service 809 that is not currently authorized by the existing contract with 810 the department. 811 (b)âExpenditures of funds carried forward must be 812 separately reported to the department. 813 (c)âAny unexpended funds that remain at the end of the 814 contract period shall be returned to the department. 815 (d)âFunds carried forward may be retained through any 816 contract renewals and any new procurements as long as the same 817 lead agency is retained by the department. 818 Section 9.âSubsection (5) of section 414.56, Florida 819 Statutes, is amended to read: 820 414.56âOffice of Continuing Care.âThe department shall 821 establish an Office of Continuing Care to ensure young adults 822 who age out of the foster care system between 18 and 21 years of 823 age, or 22 years of age with a documented disability, have a 824 point of contact until the young adult reaches the age of 26 in 825 order to receive ongoing support and care coordination needed to 826 achieve self-sufficiency. Duties of the office include, but are 827 not limited to: 828 (5)âDeveloping and administering the Step into Success 829 Workforce Education and Internship Pilot Program for foster 830 youth and former foster youth as required under s. 409.1455. 831 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 832 made by this act to section 409.145, Florida Statutes, in a 833 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 834 39.5085, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 835 39.5085âRelative Caregiver Program.â 836 (2) 837 (d)1.âRelatives or nonrelatives who have a child placed 838 with them in out-of-home care and who have obtained licensure as 839 a child-specific level I foster placement, regardless of whether 840 a court has found the child to be dependent, shall receive a 841 monthly payment in accordance with s. 409.145(3) from the date 842 the child is placed in out-of-home care with his or her 843 relatives or with nonrelatives until the child achieves 844 permanency as determined by the court pursuant to s. 39.621. 845 2.âRelatives or nonrelatives who have a child who has been 846 found to be dependent placed with them in out-of-home care shall 847 receive a monthly payment at a rate equal to the rate 848 established in s. 409.145(3) for licensed foster parents, 849 regardless of whether the relatives or nonrelatives have 850 obtained a child-specific level I foster license, from the date 851 the child is found to be dependent or from the date the child is 852 placed with them in out-of-home care, whichever is later, for a 853 period of no more than 6 months or until the child achieves 854 permanency as determined by the court pursuant to s. 39.621, 855 whichever occurs first. 856 3.âRelatives or nonrelatives who have a child who has been 857 found to be dependent placed with them in out-of-home care and 858 who have not obtained a child-specific level I foster license 859 within 6 months from the date of such placement shall receive a 860 monthly payment in an amount determined by department rule from 861 6 months after the date the child is found to be dependent or 862 from 6 months after the child is placed with them in out-of-home 863 care, whichever is later, until the relatives or nonrelatives 864 obtain a child-specific level I foster license or until the 865 child achieves permanency as determined by the court pursuant to 866 s. 39.621, whichever occurs first. The monthly payment amount 867 paid to relatives or nonrelatives pursuant to this subparagraph 868 must be less than the monthly payment amount provided to a 869 participant enrolled in the Guardianship Assistance Program 870 pursuant to s. 39.6225. 871 4.âRelatives or nonrelatives who have a child placed in 872 their care by permanent guardianship pursuant to s. 39.6221, in 873 a permanent placement with a fit and willing relative pursuant 874 to s. 39.6231, or under former s. 39.622 if the placement was 875 made before July 1, 2006, and who are not enrolled in the 876 Guardianship Assistance Program pursuant to s. 39.6225 shall 877 receive a monthly payment in an amount determined by department 878 rule which must be less than the monthly payment amount provided 879 to a participant enrolled in the Guardianship Assistance Program 880 under s. 39.6225. 881 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 882 made by this act to section 409.145, Florida Statutes, in a 883 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (5) of section 884 39.6225, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 885 39.6225âGuardianship Assistance Program.â 886 (5)âA guardian with an application approved pursuant to 887 subsection (2) who is caring for a child placed with the 888 guardian by the court pursuant to this part may receive 889 guardianship assistance payments based on the following 890 criteria: 891 (d)âThe department shall provide guardianship assistance 892 payments in the amount of $4,000 annually, paid on a monthly 893 basis, or in an amount other than $4,000 annually as determined 894 by the guardian and the department and memorialized in a written 895 agreement between the guardian and the department. The agreement 896 shall take into consideration the circumstances of the guardian 897 and the needs of the child. Changes may not be made without the 898 concurrence of the guardian. However, the amount of the monthly 899 payment may not exceed the foster care maintenance payment that 900 would have been paid during the same period if the child had 901 been in licensed care at his or her designated level of care at 902 the rate established in s. 409.145(3). 903 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 904 made by this act to section 409.145, Florida Statutes, in a 905 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 906 393.065, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 907 393.065âApplication and eligibility determination.â 908 (5)âExcept as provided in subsections (6) and (7), if a 909 client seeking enrollment in the developmental disabilities home 910 and community-based services Medicaid waiver program meets the 911 level of care requirement for an intermediate care facility for 912 individuals with intellectual disabilities pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 913 ss. 435.217(b)(1) and 440.150, the agency must assign the client 914 to an appropriate preenrollment category pursuant to this 915 subsection and must provide priority to clients waiting for 916 waiver services in the following order: 917 (b)âCategory 2, which includes clients in the preenrollment 918 categories who are: 919 1.âFrom the child welfare system with an open case in the 920 Department of Children and Familiesâ statewide automated child 921 welfare information system and who are either: 922 a.âTransitioning out of the child welfare system into 923 permanency; or 924 b.âAt least 18 years but not yet 22 years of age and who 925 need both waiver services and extended foster care services; or 926 2.âAt least 18 years but not yet 22 years of age and who 927 withdrew consent pursuant to s. 39.6251(5)(c) to remain in the 928 extended foster care system. 929 930 For individuals who are at least 18 years but not yet 22 years 931 of age and who are eligible under sub-subparagraph 1.b., the 932 agency must provide waiver services, including residential 933 habilitation, and must actively participate in transition 934 planning activities, including, but not limited to, 935 individualized service coordination, case management support, 936 and ensuring continuity of care pursuant to s. 39.6035. The 937 community-based care lead agency must fund room and board at the 938 rate established in s. 409.145(3) and provide case management 939 and related services as defined in s. 409.986(3)(e). Individuals 940 may receive both waiver services and services under s. 39.6251. 941 Services may not duplicate services available through the 942 Medicaid state plan. 943 944 Within preenrollment categories 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7, the agency 945 shall prioritize clients in the order of the date that the 946 client is determined eligible for waiver services. 947 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 948 made by this act to section 409.145, Florida Statutes, in a 949 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 950 409.1451, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 951 409.1451âThe Road-to-Independence Program.â 952 (2)âPOSTSECONDARY EDUCATION SERVICES AND SUPPORT.â 953 (b)âThe amount of the financial assistance shall be as 954 follows: 955 1.âFor a young adult who does not remain in foster care and 956 is attending a postsecondary school as provided in s. 1009.533, 957 the amount is $1,720 monthly. 958 2.âFor a young adult who remains in foster care, is 959 attending a postsecondary school, as provided in s. 1009.533, 960 and continues to reside in a licensed foster home, the amount is 961 the established room and board rate for foster parents. This 962 takes the place of the payment provided for in s. 409.145(3). 963 3.âFor a young adult who remains in foster care, but 964 temporarily resides away from a licensed foster home for 965 purposes of attending a postsecondary school as provided in s. 966 1009.533, the amount is $1,720 monthly. This takes the place of 967 the payment provided for in s. 409.145(3). 968 4.âFor a young adult who remains in foster care, is 969 attending a postsecondary school as provided in s. 1009.533, and 970 continues to reside in a licensed group home, the amount is 971 negotiated between the community-based care lead agency and the 972 licensed group home provider. 973 5.âFor a young adult who remains in foster care, but 974 temporarily resides away from a licensed group home for purposes 975 of attending a postsecondary school as provided in s. 1009.533, 976 the amount is $1,720 monthly. This takes the place of a 977 negotiated room and board rate. 978 6.âA young adult is eligible to receive financial 979 assistance during the months when he or she is enrolled in a 980 postsecondary educational institution. 981 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.